Connecticut, session 2026, HB05255.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
2 (1) "Legislatively earmarked grants" means grants of state funds
3 specifically authorized in a special or public act of the General
4 Assembly, and includes appropriated funds and bond funds;
5 (2) "Subaward" means an award of legislatively earmarked grants
6 through a pass-through entity to a subrecipient for purposes of the goals
7 or objectives for which the state funds were authorized;
8 (3) "Subrecipient" means an entity that is receiving an award of a
9 legislatively earmarked grant from a state agency or other pass-through
10 entity; and
sHB5255 / File No. 321 1

sHB5255 File No. 321
11 (4) "State agency" means any department, board, council,
12 commission, institution or other executive branch agency of state
13 government, including, but not limited to, each constituent unit.
14 (b) Not later than December 1, 2026, the Secretary of the Office of
15 Policy and Management shall develop: (1) A standard contract template
16 for legislatively earmarked grant awards, including, but not limited to,
17 audit specifications and required terms for subawards, (2) general
18 requirements for recipients of legislatively earmarked grant awards that
19 provide a subaward using such legislatively earmarked grant awards,
20 including, but not limited to, verifying that the subrecipient is not
21 suspended, disbarred or otherwise not eligible to receive a legislatively
22 earmarked grant award and obtaining an authorization for the state
23 agency or other pass-through entity to access relevant records, financial
24 statements and performance reports for purposes of monitoring the use
25 of the legislatively earmarked grant award to ensure that the subaward
26 was used for authorized purposes and such use complied with any
27 terms and conditions of the subaward and achieved the performance
28 goals associated with the legislatively earmarked grant award, and (3) a
29 general training program for state agencies in best practices concerning
30 legislatively earmarked grant awards and subawards, including on
31 using the applicable template and the requirements developed under
32 this subsection. The secretary shall offer the training developed
33 pursuant to this subsection not less than quarterly.
34 (c) On and after January 1, 2027, all state agencies shall use such
35 contract template for legislatively earmarked grant awards and shall
36 ensure that any of their employees responsible for awarding
37 legislatively earmarked grant awards and subawards attend the
38 training developed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
39 (d) Not later than December 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, each
40 state agency shall submit a report of all legislatively earmarked grant
41 awards and subawards disbursed by the state agency during the
42 preceding year to the Office of Policy and Management, in a form and
43 manner prescribed by the secretary. Such report shall include any
sHB5255 / File No. 321 2

sHB5255 File No. 321
44 evaluations conducted by the state agency of the recipient or
45 subrecipients of such awards or subawards and any concerns the state
46 agency has concerning such recipients or subrecipients and may include
47 any requests of the state agency for additional staffing or resources for
48 purposes of complying with the monitoring requirements of this
49 section. Not later than January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the
50 secretary shall compile such reports into a summary of all such awards
51 and subawards categorized by agency and shall submit such summary,
52 in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
53 to the joint standing committees of the General Assembly having
54 cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and the budgets of state
55 agencies, finance, revenue and bonding and government oversight.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (b), "grantees" was changed to "recipients of", "legislatively
earmarked" was inserted before references to "grant" for consistency
and in Subsec. (d) a reference to "Office of Policy and Management" was
added for clarity.
GOS Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5255 / File No. 321 3

sHB5255 File No. 321
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Policy & Mgmt., Off. GF - Cost 92,900 90,770
State Comptroller - Fringe GF - Cost 37,700 37,700
Benefits1
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
Explanation
The bill requires the Office of Policy and Management (OPM) to meet
certain requirements associated with legislatively directed funds (LEGs)
which results in a cost of $92,900 in FY 27 and an annual cost of $90,770
beginning in FY 28 to OPM and corresponding fringe benefit costs of
$37,700 to the Office of the State Comptroller beginning in FY 27 for a
Fiscal Administrative Officer.
This position will develop a contract template, create requirements
for certain grantees of LEGs, develop a best practices training program
for state agencies, require state agencies to annually report to OPM, and
compile a summary of the agency reports as required in the bill.
Background on OPM Policy on Legislatively Directed Funds
1The fringe benefit costs for most state employees are budgeted centrally in accounts
administered by the Comptroller. The estimated active employee fringe benefit cost
associated with most personnel changes is 41.82% of payroll in FY 27.
sHB5255 / File No. 321 4

sHB5255 File No. 321
The bill is similar to the recently announced, statewide executive
branch policy on legislatively-directed or earmarked funds (LDFs).
There are potential fiscal impacts associated with that policy which are
noted below.
The implementation of the policy may increase an agency's
administration workload based on (1) the volume of LDFs, (2) the
complexity of any particular LDF, and (3) agency resources already
dedicated to managing LDFs. Some additional staffing (e.g., temporary,
part-time or full-time) may be required by certain agencies to
accommodate this workload.
For context, PA 25-168, the FY 26 and FY 27 budget, includes 321
LDFs across sixteen executive branch agencies totaling approximately
$89 million in FY 27. The number of LDFs each such agency administers
in FY 27 ranges from one to 200 administered by the Department of
Economic and Community Development (DECD).2
To the extent that some designated recipients are unwilling or unable
to comply with the new requirements under the policy, some LDF
appropriations in FY 27 and beyond may go unspent and lapse.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
2 The Governor's recommended revised FY 27 budget includes three additional
positions within the DECD to enhance oversight of LDF grants and contracts.
sHB5255 / File No. 321 5

sHB5255 File No. 321
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5255
AN ACT IMPLEMENTING THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE
AUDITORS OF PUBLIC ACCOUNTS CONCERNING OVERSIGHT OF
STATE AGENCY GRANTS.